Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any other law appropriating  moneys, limiting expenditures
or otherwise adjusting appropriations or expenditure limitations, and in addition to  any
action by the Emergency Board, the authorized appropriations  and expenditure limitations
for the biennium ending June 30, 2017, for the following  agencies and programs are changed
by the amounts specified:
2015
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Department of Human Services:
Central services,
statewide assessments and
enterprise-wide costs and
program design services
General Fund Ch. 760 1(1) -$1,700,153
Other funds Ch. 760 2(1) +512,831
Child welfare,
self-sufficiency and
vocational rehabilitation
services
General Fund Ch. 760 1(2) -32,202,000
Federal funds Ch. 760 3(2) -9,254,132
Aging and people with
disabilities and
intellectual/developmental
disabilities programs
General Fund Ch. 760 1(3) -17,535,382
Enrolled Senate Bill 5543 (SB 5543-A) Page 1
Federal funds Ch. 760 3(3) +10,708,805
Oregon Health Authority:
Health Services Programs
General Fund Ch. 838 1(1) -22,582,478
Other funds Ch. 838 2(1) +16,304,929
Federal funds Ch. 838 4(1) -924,045,139
Central services, statewide
assessments and enterprise-
wide costs
General Fund Ch. 838 1(2) +11,030,371
Other funds Ch. 838 2(2) +475,262
Federal funds Ch. 838 4(2) -17,306,106
SECTION 2. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate June 15, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 26, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5543 (SB 5543-A) Page 2